New Jersey, session 222, S1596.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  One of the highest priorities and moral duties New Jerseyans can undertake is to support those who have served or are serving our country and State in the Armed Forces. b.  Many service members experience multiple deployments, separating them from family, community, and traditional supports for extended periods of time. c.  Service members and their families often endure extended periods of adjustment when faced with physical and psychological disabilities including post-traumatic stress and traumatic brain injuries, and other debilitating health conditions that pose long-standing challenges for our veterans and their families and for our State. d.  The Legislature of this State is committed to the members of our military community and their families, and to strengthening their systems of care and support in a manner that is responsive to their needs. e.  A Veterans Suicide Prevention Commission to plan and coordinate the work of State agencies, and to develop systems of services and support that reflect a coordinated collective community approach, to serve our military community is appropriate and necessary. 2.  This act may be cited as the Veterans Suicide Prevention Commission Act. The purpose of the Veterans Suicide Prevention Commission shall be to assess, support, and create programs for the successful transition, adjustment, and reintegration of service members into civilian life through the coordination of the collective efforts of State agencies with the goal of preventing veteran suicides. The commission shall coordinate with State agencies to effectively and responsibly meet the needs of the military community.  The commission shall conduct planning, research, education, training, and evaluation activities to improve the operations and coordination of the systems of care and support provided by the agencies.  The commission shall coordinate its activities with the activities of the Department of Veterans Affairs for its veterans, service members, and their families. 3.  The Veterans Suicide Prevention Commission shall consist of the following members: a.  (1)  The Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs, or a designee, who shall serve ex-officio; and (2)  The Commissioner of the Department of Human Services, or a designee, who shall serve ex-officio. b.  The Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall appoint: (1)  a representative from Veterans Haven; (2)  a Veterans Service Officer; and (3)  a veteran. c.  The Governor shall appoint four persons as follows: (1) one person upon the recommendation of the President of the Senate who shall have experience in treating veterans and service members with brain injuries; (2)  one person upon the recommendation of the Minority Leader of the Senate who shall have experience in providing mental health counseling to veterans and service members; (3)  one person upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly who shall be a representative of a Veterans Diversion Court; and (4)  one person upon the recommendation of the Minority Leader of the General Assembly who shall have experience as a community faith-based spiritual leader who has experience with working with service members, veterans, and their families. d.  The Governor shall appoint four persons as follows: (1)  one person with experience in providing substance abuse services to service members, veterans and their families; (2)  one person with experience in employment and support networks for service members and veterans; (3)  one female spouse or partner of a service member; and (4)  one male spouse or partner of a service member. 4.  a.  Members of the commission shall be appointed for a term of four years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.  Upon expiration of the initial terms, each member may be reappointed for an additional term of four years. b.  Of the initial appointments made by the: Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs, one shall serve for a term of two years, one shall serve for a term of three years, and one shall serve for a term of four years; and Governor, two shall serve for a term of one year, two shall serve for a term of two years, two shall serve for a term of three years, and two shall serve for a term of four years. c.  Vacancies resulting for reasons other than the expiration of a term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. d.  Members of the commission shall be appointed within 90 days after the effective date of this act, and shall hold their initial organizational meeting as soon as practicable, but not later than 45 days after the appointment of a majority of its members.  The Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs, or a designee, shall serve as chair of the initial meeting and until the commission votes on a member or members to serve as chair or co-chairs of the commission. e.  The commission, in its discretion, may divide its membership into subcommittees in the course of carrying out its duties. f.  A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.  The commission may conduct business without a majority being present, but shall not adopt recommendations without the approval of a majority of the total membership of the commission. g.  Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the commission for its purposes. h.  The Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide clerical and other assistance, and such professional staff as the commission requires to carry out its work.  The commission shall also be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available for its purposes. i.  The commission shall hold at least six meetings each year, but otherwise shall meet at the call of the chair.  Meetings of the commission may be conducted in person or by telephone or video conference. j.  The commission may adopt policies and procedures for an organizational structure, and policies and procedures for the commission's internal operations as are necessary to carry out its function and responsibilities. 5.  a.  The primary focus of the commission shall be on improving the efficiency and effectiveness of those State programs and services related to the military community with the goal of the prevention of veteran suicides. b.  The commission shall review the activities related to the military community of each State agency to ensure there is efficient and effective coordination and alignment with the needs of the military community. c.  The commission shall ensure accountability by tracking the progress of initiatives, programs, and services; developing strategic collaboration among State agencies; and increasing public awareness of the services and support available to the military community to prevent veteran suicides. d.  The commission will promote coordination and efficiency among State, county, and local units of government through knowledge sharing, mobilization of resources, and an aligned approach to serving the military community to prevent veteran suicides. 6.  The commission shall issue periodic reports, which shall include, but not be limited to, its strategic goals, its public research agenda, and its performance and progress in meeting its goals.  The reports shall be submitted to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature. 7.  This act shall take effect immediately.